Missouri, session 2026, HB3431.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 21, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 21.153, to read as follows:
21.153. Subject to appropriation, partisan employees of the general assembly
including, but not limited to, legislator assistants, policy directors, and chiefs of staff
shall receive a pay increase if the employee has or obtains a degree from an accredited
college or university. The pay increase shall be as follows:
(1) For staff with a bachelor's degree, three percent; and
(2) For staff with a master's or doctoral degree, six percent.

An employee shall receive only the increase for the highest degree he or she holds.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.